North Dakota statutes. TITLE 45 Partnerships
CHAPTER 45-10.2 Uniform Limited Partnership Act
45-10.2-36. (306)
Person erroneously believing self to be limited partner.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a person that makes an investment in a business enterprise and erroneously but in good faith believes that the person has become a limited partner in the enterprise is not liable for the obligations of the enterprise by reason of making the investment, receiving distributions from the enterprise, or exercising any rights of or appropriate to a limited partner, if, on ascertaining the mistake, the person:

Causes an appropriate certificate of limited partnership, amendment, or statement of correction to be signed and delivered to the secretary of state for filing; or

Withdraws from future participation as an owner in the enterprise by signing and delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of withdrawal under this section.

A person that makes an investment described in subsection 1 is liable to the same extent as a general partner to any third party that enters into a transaction with the enterprise, believing in good faith that the person is a general partner, before the secretary of state files a statement of withdrawal, certificate of limited partnership, amendment, or statement of correction to show that the person is not a general partner.

If a person makes a diligent effort in good faith to comply with subdivision a of subsection 1 and is unable to cause the appropriate certificate of limited partnership, amendment, or statement of correction to be signed and delivered to the secretary of state for filing, then the person has the right to withdraw from the enterprise pursuant to subdivision b of subsection 1 even if the withdrawal would otherwise breach an agreement with others that are or have agreed to become co-owners of the enterprise.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-37. (401)
Becoming general partner.

A person becomes a general partner:

As provided in the partnership agreement;

Under subdivision b of subsection 3 of section 45-10.2-66 following the dissociation of the last general partner of a limited partnership;

As the result of a conversion or merger under sections 45-10.2-94 through 45-10.2-106; or

With the consent of all the partners.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

Collateral References.

Limited partnership: sufficiency of procedure for designating or admitting additional general partner, 6 A.L.R.4th 1277.

45-10.2-38. (402)
General partner agent of limited partnership.

Each general partner is an agent of the limited partnership for the purposes of its activities. An act of a general partner, including the signing of a record in the name of the partnership, for apparently carrying on in the ordinary course the activities of the limited partnership or activities of the kind carried on by the limited partnership binds the limited partnership, unless the general partner did not have authority to act for the limited partnership in the particular matter and the person with which the general partner was dealing knew, had received a notification, or had notice under subsection 4 of section 45-10.2-06 that the general partner lacked authority.

An act of a general partner which is not apparently for carrying on in the ordinary course the activities of the limited partnership or activities of the kind carried on by the limited partnership binds the limited partnership only if the act was actually authorized by all of the other partners.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-39. (403)
Limited partnership liable for actionable conduct of general partner.

A limited partnership is liable for loss or injury caused to a person, or for a penalty incurred, as a result of a wrongful act or omission, or other actionable conduct, of a general partner acting in the ordinary course of activities of the limited partnership or with authority of the limited partnership.

If, in the course of the activities of the limited partnership or while acting with authority of the limited partnership, a general partner receives or causes the limited partnership to receive money or property of a person not a partner, and the money or property is misapplied by a general partner, then the limited partnership is liable for the loss.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-40. (404)
Liability of general partner.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 3, all general partners are liable jointly and severally for all obligations of the limited partnership unless otherwise agreed by the claimant or provided by law.

A person that becomes a general partner of an existing limited partnership is not personally liable for an obligation of a limited partnership incurred before the person became a general partner.

An obligation of a limited partnership incurred while the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership, whether arising in contract, tort, or otherwise, is solely the obligation of the limited partnership.

A general partner is not personally liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for such an obligation solely by reason of being or acting as a general partner.

This subsection applies despite anything inconsistent in the partnership agreement that existed immediately before the consent required under subdivision b of subsection 2 of section 45-10.2-42 to become a limited liability limited partnership pursuant to chapter 45-23.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-41. (405)
Actions by and against partnership and partners.

To the extent not inconsistent with section 45-10.2-40, a general partner may be joined in an action against the limited partnership or named in a separate action.

A judgment against a limited partnership is not by itself a judgment against a general partner. A judgment against a limited partnership may not be satisfied from assets of a general partner unless there is also a judgment against the general partner.

A judgment creditor of a general partner may not levy execution against the assets of the general partner to satisfy a judgment based on a claim against the limited partnership, unless the partner is personally liable for the claim under section 45-10.2-40, and:

A judgment based on the same claim has been obtained against the limited partnership and a writ of execution on the judgment has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part;

The limited partnership is a debtor in bankruptcy;

The general partner has agreed that the creditor need not exhaust limited partnership assets;

A court grants permission to the judgment creditor to levy execution against the assets of a general partner based on a finding:

That limited partnership assets subject to execution are clearly insufficient to satisfy the judgment;

That exhaustion of limited partnership assets is excessively burdensome; or

That the grant of permission is an appropriate exercise of equitable powers of the court; or

Liability is imposed on the general partner by law or contract independent of the existence of the limited partnership.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2009, ch. 106, § 63.

Collateral References.

Partner’s breach of fiduciary duty to copartner on sale of partnership interest to another partner,
4 A.L.R.4th 1122.

Derivative liability of partner for punitive damages for wrongful act of copartner, 14 A.L.R.4th 1335.

Right of limited partner to maintain derivative action on behalf of partnership, 26 A.L.R.4th 264.

Civil liability of one partner to another or to the partnership based on partner’s personal purchase of partnership property during existence of partnership, 37 A.L.R.4th 494.

Liability of limited partner arising from taking part in control of business under uniform limited partnership act, 79 A.L.R.4th 427.

45-10.2-42. (406)
Management rights of general partner.

Each general partner has equal rights in the management and conduct of the activities of the limited partnership. Except as expressly provided in this chapter, any matter relating to the activities of the limited partnership may be exclusively decided by the general partner or, if there is more than one general partner, by a majority of the general partners.

The consent of each partner is necessary:

To amend the partnership agreement;

Subject to section 45-10.2-104, to amend the certificate of limited partnership to convert the limited partnership to a limited liability limited partnership; and

To sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of the property of the limited partnership, with or without the good will, other than in the usual and regular course of the activities of the limited partnership.

A limited partnership shall reimburse a general partner for payments made and indemnify a general partner for liabilities incurred by the general partner in the ordinary course of the activities of the partnership or for the preservation of its activities or property.

A limited partnership shall reimburse a general partner for an advance to the limited partnership beyond the amount of capital the general partner agreed to contribute.

A payment or advance made by a general partner which gives rise to an obligation of the limited partnership under subsection 3 or 4 constitutes a loan to the limited partnership which accrues interest from the date of the payment or advance.

A general partner is not entitled to remuneration for services performed for the partnership.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-43. (407)
Right of general partner and former general partner to information.

A general partner, without having any particular purpose for seeking the information, may inspect and copy during regular business hours:

In the principal executive office of the limited partnership, required information; and

At a reasonable location specified by the limited partnership, any other records maintained by the limited partnership regarding the activities and financial condition of the limited partnership.

Each general partner and the limited partnership shall furnish to a general partner:

Without demand, any information concerning the activities and financial condition of the limited partnership reasonably required for the proper exercise of the rights and duties of the general partner under the partnership agreement or this chapter; and

On demand, any other information concerning the activities of the limited partnership, except to the extent the demand or the information demanded is unreasonable or otherwise improper under the circumstances.

Subject to subsection 5, on ten days’ demand made in a record received by the limited partnership, a person dissociated as a general partner may have access to the information and records described in subsection 1 at the location specified in subsection 1 if:

The information or record pertains to the period during which the person was a general partner;

The person seeks the information or record in good faith; and

The person satisfies the requirements imposed on a limited partner by subsection 2 of section 45-10.2-34.

The limited partnership shall respond to a demand made pursuant to subsection 3 in the same manner as provided in subsection 3 of section 45-10.2-34.

If a general partner dies, then section 45-10.2-65 applies.

The limited partnership may impose reasonable restrictions on the use of information under this section. In any dispute concerning the reasonableness of a restriction under this subsection, the limited partnership has the burden of proving reasonableness.

A limited partnership may charge a person dissociated as a general partner that makes a demand under this section reasonable costs of copying, limited to the costs of labor and material.

A general partner or person dissociated as a general partner may exercise the rights under this section through an attorney or other agent. Any restriction imposed under subsection 6 or by the partnership agreement applies both to the attorney or other agent and to the general partner or person dissociated as a general partner.

The rights under this section do not extend to a person as transferee, but the rights under subsection 3 of a person dissociated as a general partner may be exercised by the legal representative of an individual who dissociated as a general partner under subdivisions b and c of subsection 7 of section 45-10.2-57.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-44. (408)
General standards of conduct of general partner.

The only fiduciary duties that a general partner has to the limited partnership and the other partners are the duties of loyalty and care under subsections 2 and 3.

A duty of loyalty of the general partner to the limited partnership and the other partners is limited to the following:

To account to the limited partnership and hold as trustee for it any property, profit, or benefit derived by the general partner in the conduct and winding up of the activities of the limited partnership or derived from a use by the general partner of limited partnership property, including the appropriation of a limited partnership opportunity;

To refrain from dealing with the limited partnership in the conduct or winding up of the activities of the limited partnership as or on behalf of a party having an interest adverse to the limited partnership; and

To refrain from competing with the limited partnership in the conduct or winding up of the activities of the limited partnership.

Duty of care of a general partner to the limited partnership and the other partners in the conduct and winding up of the activities of a limited partnership is limited to refraining from engaging in grossly negligent or reckless conduct, intentional misconduct, or a knowing violation of law.

A general partner shall discharge the duties to the partnership and the other partners under this chapter or under the partnership agreement and exercise any rights consistently with the obligation of good faith and fair dealing.

A general partner does not violate a duty or obligation under this chapter or under the partnership agreement merely because conduct of the general partner furthers the interest of that general partner.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-45. (409)
Transfer of partnership property.

Subject to the effect of a notification effective under subsections 4 and 9 of section 45-10.2-06, property held in the name of a limited partnership may be transferred by a record of transfer signed by a general partner in the limited partnership name.

If a transfer has been made to an initial transferee through a record of transfer effective under subsection 1, a limited partnership may recover the transferred limited partnership property:

From a transferee only if the limited partnership proves that signing the record of initial transfer did not bind the partnership under section 45-10.2-38; and

As to a subsequent transferee who gave value for the property, only if the limited partnership proves that the subsequent transferee knew or had received a notification that the person that signed the record of initial transfer lacked authority to bind the partnership.

A partnership may not recover partnership property from a subsequent transferee if the partnership would not have been entitled to recover the property under subsection 2 from any earlier transferee of the property.

This section does not affect the power of a person dissociated as a general partner to bind a limited partnership under subsection 1 of section 45-10.2-60 and subsection 2 of section 45-10.2-70.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-46. (501)
Form of contribution.

A contribution of a partner may consist of tangible or intangible property or other benefit to the limited partnership, including money, services performed, promissory notes, other agreements to contribute cash or property, and contracts for services to be performed.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-47. (502)
Liability for contribution.

The obligation of a partner to contribute money or other property or other benefit to, or to perform services for, a limited partnership is not excused by the death of a partner, disability, or other inability to perform personally.

If a partner does not make a promised nonmonetary contribution, the partner is obligated at the option of the limited partnership to contribute money equal to that portion of the value, as stated in the required information, of the stated contribution that has not been made.

The obligation of a partner to make a contribution or return money or other property paid or distributed in violation of this chapter may be compromised only by consent of all partners. A creditor of a limited partnership that extends credit or otherwise acts in reliance on an obligation described in subsection 1, without notice of any compromise under this subsection, may enforce the original obligation.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-48. (503)
Sharing of distributions.

A distribution by a limited partnership must be shared among the partners on the basis of the value, as stated in the required information when the limited partnership decides to make the distribution, of the contributions the limited partnership has received from each partner.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-49. (504)
Interim distributions.

A partner does not have a right to any distribution before the dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership unless the limited partnership decides to make an interim distribution.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-50. (505)
No distribution on account of dissociation.

A person does not have a right to receive a distribution on account of dissociation.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-51. (506)
Distribution in kind.

A partner does not have a right to demand or receive any distribution from a limited partnership in any form other than cash. Subject to subsection 2 of section 45-10.2-75, a limited partnership may distribute an asset in kind to the extent each partner receives a percentage of the asset equal to the share of distributions of the partner.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-52. (507)
Right to distribution.

When a partner or transferee becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the partner or transferee has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited partnership with respect to the distribution. However, the obligation of the limited partnership to make a distribution is subject to offset for any amount owed to the limited partnership by the partner or dissociated partner on whose account the distribution is made.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-53. (508)
Limitation on distribution.

A limited partnership may not make a distribution in violation of the partnership agreement.

A limited partnership may not make a distribution if after the distribution:

The limited partnership would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the ordinary course of the activities of the limited partnership; or

The total assets of the limited partnership would be less than the sum of its total liabilities plus the amount that would be needed, if the limited partnership were to be dissolved, wound up, and terminated at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights upon dissolution, winding up, and termination of partners whose preferential rights are superior to those of persons receiving the distribution.

A limited partnership may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subsection 2 on financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable in the circumstances or on a fair valuation or other method that is reasonable in the circumstances.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, the effect of a distribution under subsection 2 is measured:

In the case of distribution by purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of a transferable interest in the limited partnership, as of the date money or other property is transferred or debt incurred by the limited partnership; and

In all other cases, as of the date:

The distribution is authorized, if the payment occurs within one hundred twenty days after that date; or

The payment is made, if payment occurs more than one hundred twenty days after the distribution is authorized.

Indebtedness of a limited partnership to a partner incurred by reason of a distribution made in accordance with this section is at parity with the indebtedness of the limited partnership to its general, unsecured creditors.

Indebtedness of a limited partnership, including indebtedness issued in connection with or as part of a distribution, is not considered a liability for purposes of subsection 2 if the terms of the indebtedness provide that payment of principal and interest are made only to the extent that a distribution could then be made to partners under this section.

If indebtedness is issued as a distribution, each payment of principal or interest on the indebtedness is treated as a distribution, the effect of which is measured on the date the payment is made.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-54. (509)
Liability for improper distributions.

A general partner that consents to a distribution made in violation of section 45-10.2-53 is personally liable to the limited partnership for the amount of the distribution which exceeds the amount that could have been distributed without the violation if it is established that in consenting to the distribution the general partner failed to comply with section 45-10.2-44.

A partner or transferee that received a distribution knowing that the distribution to that partner or transferee was made in violation of section 45-10.2-53 is personally liable to the limited partnership but only to the extent that the distribution received by the partner or transferee exceeded the amount that could have been properly paid under section 45-10.2-53.

A general partner against which an action is commenced under subsection 1 may:

Implead in the action any other person that is liable under subsection 1 and compel contribution from the person; and

Implead in the action any person that received a distribution in violation of subsection 2 and compel contribution from the person in the amount the person received in violation of subsection 2.

An action under this section is barred if it is not commenced within two years after the distribution.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-55. (601)
Dissociation as limited partner.

A person does not have a right to dissociate as a limited partner before the termination of the limited partnership.

A person is dissociated from a limited partnership as a limited partner upon the occurrence of any of the following events:

The limited partnership has notice of the express will of a person to withdraw as a limited partner or on a later date specified by the person;

An event agreed to in the partnership agreement as causing the dissociation of a person as a limited partner;

The expulsion of a person as a limited partner pursuant to the partnership agreement;

The expulsion of a person as a limited partner by the unanimous consent of the other partners if:

It is unlawful to carry on the activities of the limited partnership with the person as a limited partner;

There has been a transfer of all of the transferable interest of the person in the limited partnership, other than a transfer for security purposes, or a court order charging the interest of the person, which has not been foreclosed;

The person is a corporation and, within ninety days after the limited partnership notifies the person that it will be expelled as a limited partner because it has filed a certificate of dissolution or the equivalent, its charter has been revoked, or its right to conduct business has been suspended by the jurisdiction of its incorporation, there is not revocation of the certificate of dissolution or no reinstatement of its charter or its right to conduct business; or

The person is a limited liability company or partnership that has been dissolved and whose business is being wound up;

On application by the limited partnership, the expulsion of the person as a limited partner by judicial order because:

The person engaged in wrongful conduct that adversely and materially affected the activities of the limited partnership;

The person willfully or persistently committed a material breach of the partnership agreement or of the obligation of good faith and fair dealing under section 45-10.2-35; or

The person engaged in conduct relating to the activities of the limited partnership which make it not reasonably practicable to carry on the activities with the person as limited partner;

In the case of a person who is an individual, the death of the person;

In the case of a person that is a trust or is acting as a limited partner by virtue of being a trustee of a trust, distribution of the entire transferable interest in the limited partnership of the trust, but not merely by reason of the substitution of a successor trustee;

In the case of a person that is an estate or is acting as a limited partner by virtue of being a personal representative of an estate, distribution of the entire transferable interest of the estate in the limited partnership, but not merely by reason of the substitution of a successor personal representative;

Termination of a limited partner that is not an individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, trust, or estate; and

The participation by limited partnership in a conversion or merger under sections 45-10.2-94 through 45-10.2-106, if the limited partnership:

Is not the converted or surviving organization; or

Is the converted or surviving organization but, as a result of the conversion or merger, the person ceases to be a limited partner.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-56. (602)
Effect of dissociation as limited partner.

Upon the dissociation of a person as a limited partner:

Subject to section 45-10.2-65, the person does not have further rights as a limited partner;

The obligation of a person for good faith and fair dealing as a limited partner under subsection 2 of section 45-10.2-35 continues only as to matters arising and events occurring before the dissociation; and

Subject to section 45-10.2-65 and sections 45-10.2-94 through 45-10.2-106, any transferable interest owned by the person in the capacity as a limited partner immediately before dissociation is owned by the person as a mere transferee.

The dissociation of a person as a limited partner does not of itself discharge the person from any obligation to the limited partnership or the other partners which the person incurred while a limited partner.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-57. (603)
Dissociation as general partner.

A person is dissociated from a limited partnership as a general partner upon the occurrence of any of the following events:

The limited partnership having notice of the express will of a person to withdraw as a general partner or on a later date specified by the person;

An event agreed to in the partnership agreement as causing the dissociation of a person as a general partner;

The expulsion of a person as a general partner pursuant to the partnership agreement;

The expulsion of a person as a general partner by the unanimous consent of the other partners if:

It is unlawful to carry on the activities of the limited partnership with the person as a general partner;

There has been a transfer of all or substantially all of the transferable interest of a person in the limited partnership, other than a transfer for security purposes, or a court order charging the interest of a person, which has not been foreclosed;

The person is a corporation and, within ninety days after the limited partnership notifies the person that it will be expelled as a general partner because it filed a certificate of dissolution or the equivalent, its charter has been revoked, or its right to conduct business has been suspended by the jurisdiction of its incorporation, there is no revocation of the certificate of dissolution or no reinstatement of its charter or its right to conduct business; or

The person is a limited liability company or partnership that has been dissolved and whose business is being wound up;

On application by the limited partnership, the expulsion of a person as a general partner by judicial determination because:

The person engaged in wrongful conduct that adversely and materially affected the limited partnership activities;

The person willfully or persistently committed a material breach of the partnership agreement or of a duty owed to the partnership or the other partners under section 45-10.2-44; or

The person engaged in conduct relating to the activities of the limited partnership which makes it not reasonably practicable to carry on the activities of the limited partnership with the person as a general partner;

The person:

Becoming a debtor in bankruptcy;

Executing an assignment for the benefit of creditors;

Seeking, consenting to, or acquiescing in the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the person or of all or substantially all of the property of the person; or

Failing, within ninety days after the appointment, to have vacated or stayed the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the general partner or of all or substantially all of the property of the person obtained without the consent or acquiescence of the person, or failing within ninety days after the expiration of a stay to have the appointment vacated;

In the case of a person who is an individual:

The death of the person;

The appointment of a guardian or general conservator for the person; or

A judicial determination that the person has otherwise become incapable of performing the duties as a general partner under the partnership agreement;

In the case of a person that is a trust or is acting as a general partner by virtue of being a trustee of a trust, distribution of the entire transferable interest of the trust in the limited partnership, but not merely by reason of the substitution of a successor trustee;

In the case of a person that is an estate or is acting as a general partner by virtue of being a personal representative of an estate, distribution of the entire transferable interest of the estate in the limited partnership, but not merely by reason of the substitution of a successor personal representative;

Termination of a general partner that is not an individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, trust, or estate; or

The participation of the limited partnership in a conversion or merger under sections 45-10.2-94 through 45-10.2-106, if the limited partnership:

Is not the converted or surviving organization; or

Is the converted or surviving organization but, as a result of the conversion or merger, the person ceases to be a general partner.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-58. (604)
Power of a person to dissociate as a general partner — Wrongful dissociation.

A person has the power to dissociate as a general partner at any time, rightfully or wrongfully, by express will pursuant to subsection 1 of section 45-10.2-57.

The dissociation of a person as a general partner is wrongful only if:

It is in breach of an express provision of the partnership agreement; or

It occurs before the termination of the limited partnership and:

The person withdraws as a general partner by express will;

The person is expelled as a general partner by judicial determination under subsection 5 of section 45-10.2-57;

The person is dissociated as a general partner by becoming a debtor in bankruptcy; or

In the case of a person that is not an individual, trust other than a business trust, or estate, the person is expelled or otherwise dissociated as a general partner because it willfully dissolved or terminated.

A person that wrongfully dissociates as a general partner is liable to the limited partnership and, subject to section 45-10.2-89, to the other partners for damages caused by the dissociation. The liability is in addition to any other obligation of the general partner to the limited partnership or to the other partners.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-59. (605)
Effect of dissociation as general partner.

Upon the dissociation of a person as a general partner:

The right of the person to participate as a general partner in the management and conduct of the activities of the partnership terminates;

The duty of loyalty of the person as a general partner under subdivision c of subsection 2 of section 45-10.2-44 terminates;

The duty of loyalty of the person as a general partner under subdivisions a and b of subsection 2 of section 45-10.2-44 and duty of care under subsection 3 of section 45-10.2-44 continue only with regard to matters arising and events occurring before dissociation of the person as a general partner;

The person may sign and deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of dissociation pertaining to the person and, at the request of the limited partnership, shall sign an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership which states that the person has dissociated; and

Subject to section 45-10.2-65 and sections 45-10.2-94 through 45-10.2-106, any transferable interest owned by the person immediately before dissociation in the capacity as a general partner is owned by the person as a mere transferee.

The dissociation of a person as a general partner does not of itself discharge the person from any obligation to the limited partnership or the other partners which the person incurred while a general partner.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-60. (606)
Power to bind and liability to limited partnership before dissolution of partnership of person dissociated as general partner.

After a person is dissociated as a general partner and before the limited partnership is dissolved, or is converted or merged out of existence under sections 45-10.2-94 through 45-10.2-106, the limited partnership is bound by an act of the person if:

The act would have bound the limited partnership under section 45-10.2-38 before the dissociation; and

At the time the other party enters into the transaction:

Less than two years have passed since the dissociation; and

The other party does not have notice of the dissociation and reasonably believes that the person is a general partner.

If a limited partnership is bound under subsection 1, then the person dissociated as a general partner which caused the limited partnership to be bound is liable:

To the limited partnership for any damage caused to the limited partnership arising from the obligation incurred under subsection 1; and

If a general partner or another person dissociated as a general partner is liable for the obligation, then to the general partner or other person for any damage caused to the general partner or other person arising from the liability.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-61. (607)
Liability to other persons of person dissociated as general partner.

The dissociation of a person as a general partner does not of itself discharge the liability of a person as a general partner for an obligation of the limited partnership incurred before dissociation. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 3, the person is not liable for an obligation of a limited partnership incurred after dissociation.

A person whose dissociation as a general partner resulted in a dissolution and winding up of the activities of the limited partnership is liable to the same extent as a general partner under section 45-10.2-40 on an obligation incurred by the limited partnership under section 45-10.2-70.

A person that has dissociated as a general partner but whose dissociation did not result in a dissolution and winding up of the activities of the limited partnership is liable on a transaction entered into by the limited partnership after the dissociation only if:

A general partner would be liable on the transaction; and

At the time the other party enters into the transaction:

Less than two years have passed since the dissociation; and

The other party does not have notice of the dissociation and reasonably believes that the person is a general partner.

By agreement with a creditor of a limited partnership and the limited partnership, a person dissociated as a general partner may be released from liability for an obligation of the limited partnership.

A person dissociated as a general partner is released from liability for an obligation of the limited partnership if the creditor of the limited partnership, with notice of the dissociation of the person as a general partner but without the consent of the person, agrees to a material alteration in the nature or time of payment of the obligation.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-62. (701)
Transferable interest of a partner.

The only interest of a partner that is transferable is the transferable interest of the partner. A transferable interest is personal property.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-63. (702)
Transfer of the transferable interest of a partner.

A transfer, in whole or in part, of the transferable interest of a partner:

Is permissible;

Does not by itself cause the dissociation of a partner or a dissolution and winding up of the activities of the limited partnership; and

Does not, as against the other partners or the limited partnership, entitle the transferee:

To participate in the management or conduct of the activities of the limited partnership;

To require access to information concerning the transactions of the limited partnership except as otherwise provided in subsection 3; or

To inspect or copy the required information or the other records of the limited partnership.

A transferee has a right to receive, in accordance with the transfer:

Distributions to which the transferor would otherwise be entitled; and

Upon the dissolution and winding up of the activities of the limited partnership the net amount otherwise distributable to the transferor.

In a dissolution and winding up, a transferee is entitled to an account of the transactions of the limited partnership only from the date of dissolution.

Upon transfer, the transferor retains the rights of a partner other than the interest in distributions transferred and retains all duties and obligations of a partner.

A limited partnership need not give effect to the rights of a transferee under this section until the limited partnership has notice of the transfer.

A transfer of the transferable interest of a partner in the limited partnership in violation of a restriction on transfer contained in the partnership agreement is ineffective as to a person having notice of the restriction at the time of transfer.

A transferee that becomes a partner with respect to a transferable interest is liable for the obligations of the transferor under sections 45-10.2-47 and 45-10.2-54. However, the transferee is not obligated for liabilities unknown to the transferee at the time the transferee became a partner.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.